Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-406
Emery wheels and grindstones; use and operation.

No emery wheels or grindstones in any factory, mill or workshop, shall be used when known to the person using the same to be cracked or otherwise defective, nor operated at a greater speed than indicated or guaranteed by the manufacturer of such emery wheel or grindstone.

Laws 1911, c. 67, § 6, p. 301;

R.S.1913, § 3593;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. IV, art. IV, § 6, p. 560;

C.S.1922, § 7687;

C.S.1929, § 48-406;

R.S.1943, § 48-406.